Tennessee statutes. Title 66 Property
Part 2

Tennessee Condominium Act of 2008 — General Provisions

66-27-201. Short title.

This part and parts 3-5 of this chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Condominium Act of 2008.”

Acts 2008, ch. 766, § 1.

66-27-202. Applicability.

This part and parts 3-5 of this chapter apply to all condominiums created within this state after January 1, 2009. Sections 66-27-205 — 66-27-207; 66-27-303; 66-27-304; 66-27-402(a)(1)-(6) and (11)-(16); 66-27-411; 66-27-414(g); 66-27-415; 66-27-417; part 5 of this chapter; and § 66-27-203, to the extent necessary in construing any of the sections listed in this subsection (a), apply to all condominiums created in this state before January 1, 2009; but those sections apply only with respect to events and circumstances occurring after January 1, 2009, and, with the exception of § 66-27-414(g), do not invalidate or supersede existing provisions of the master deed, master lease, declaration, bylaws or plats of those condominiums existing on January 1, 2009.

Part 1 of this chapter does not apply to condominiums created after January 1, 2009, and does not invalidate any amendment adopted after January 1, 2009, to the master deed, bylaws, or plats of any condominium created before January 1, 2009, if the amendment would be permitted by this part and parts 3-5 of this chapter. The amendment must be adopted in conformity with the procedures and requirements specified by those instruments and by part 1 of this chapter. If the amendment grants to any person any rights, powers, or privileges permitted by this part and parts 3-5 of this chapter, all correlative obligations, liabilities, and restrictions in this part and parts 3-5 of this chapter also apply to that person.

Condominiums existing before January 1, 2009, may elect to be governed by this part and parts 3-5 of this chapter in their entirety by amending and restating their then existing master deed, bylaws, and plat or plats in a manner that satisfies the requirements of subsection (b) and any additional requirements applicable to a condominium created under this part and parts 3-5 of this chapter. Condominiums created before January 1, 2009, may elect to be governed by this part and parts 3-5 of this chapter by specifically electing to do so in their master deed, master lease, or declaration and by satisfying all requirements applicable to a condominium created under this part and parts 3-5 of this chapter.

This part and parts 3-5 of this chapter do not apply to condominiums or units located outside this state.

Acts 2008, ch. 766, § 1; 2009, ch. 215, § 1.

66-27-203. Definitions for parts 2–5.

In the declaration and bylaws, unless specifically provided otherwise or the context otherwise requires, and in this part and parts 3-5 of this chapter:

“Affiliate of a declarant” means any person who controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with a declarant;

A person “controls” a declarant if the person:

Is a general partner, officer, director, manager or managing member, or employer of the declarant;

Directly or indirectly or acting in concert with one (1) or more other persons, or through one (1) or more subsidiaries, owns, controls, holds with power to vote, or holds proxies representing, more than twenty percent (20%) of the voting interest in the declarant; or

Controls in any manner the election of a majority of the directors, managers, or managing members of the declarant;

A person “is controlled by” a declarant if the declarant:

Is a general partner, officer, director, manager, managing member or employer of the person;

Directly or indirectly or acting in concert with one (1) or more other persons, or through one (1) or more subsidiaries, owns, controls, holds with power to vote, or holds proxies representing, more than twenty percent (20%) of the voting interest in the person; or

Controls in any manner the election of a majority of the directors, managers, or managing members of the person;

Control does not exist if the powers described in this subdivision (1) are held solely as security for an obligation and are not exercised;

“Allocated interests” means the undivided interest in the common elements, the common expense liability, and votes in the association allocated to each unit;

“Association” means the unit owners' association organized under § 66-27-401;

“Board of directors” means the body, regardless of name, designated in the declaration to act on behalf of the association;

“Common elements” means all portions of a condominium other than the units;

“Common expense liability” means the liability for common expenses allocated to each unit pursuant to § 66-27-307;

“Common expenses” means actual or anticipated expenditures made by or financial liabilities of the association, together with any allocations to reserves;

“Condominium” means real estate, portions of which are designated for separate ownership and the remainder of which is designated for common ownership solely by the owners of those portions by the recording of a declaration pursuant to the terms of this part and parts 3-5 of this chapter. Real estate is not a condominium unless the undivided interests in the common elements are vested in the unit owners pursuant to a declaration recorded under this part and parts 3-5 of this chapter or prior law applicable to the declaration;

“Conversion building” means a building that at any time before creation of the condominium was occupied wholly or partially by persons other than purchasers;

“Declarant” means any person or group of persons acting in concert who:

As part of a common promotional plan, offers to dispose of the person's or group’s interest in a unit not previously disposed of, and files a declaration pursuant to this part and parts 3-5 of this chapter; or

Reserves or succeeds to any special declarant or development right;

“Declaration” means any instruments, however denominated, that create a condominium, and any amendments to those instruments;

“Development rights” means any right or combination of rights reserved by a declarant in the declaration:

To add real estate to a condominium;

To create units, common elements, or limited common elements within a condominium;

To allocate limited common elements, other than those described in §§ 66-27-302 and 66-27-304, to specific units;

To grant licenses for parties who are not unit owners to use portions of the common elements or limited common elements, subject to an obligation to pay an equitable share of the common expenses attributable to the licensed common elements or limited common elements;

To the extent not otherwise permitted as a right held by unit owners as provided in § 66-27-313(a), to subdivide units or convert units into common elements; or

To withdraw real estate from a condominium;

“Dispose” or “disposition” means a voluntary transfer to a purchaser of any legal or equitable interest in a unit, but does not include the transfer or release of a security interest;

“Identifying number” means a symbol, name, or address that identifies only one (1) unit in a condominium;

“Leasehold condominium” means a condominium in which all or a portion of the real estate is subject to a lease, the expiration or termination of which will terminate the condominium or reduce its size;

“Limited common element” means a portion of the common elements allocated by the declaration or by operation of § 66-27-302(2) or (4) for the exclusive use of one (1) or more, but fewer than all, of the units;

“Master association” means an organization described in § 66-27-321, whether or not it is also an association described in § 66-27-401;

“Person” means a natural person, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture, government, governmental subdivision or agency, or other legal or commercial entity;

“Purchaser” means any person, other than a declarant, who by means of a contract or voluntary transfer acquires a legal or equitable interest in a unit other than:

A leasehold interest, including renewal options, of less than twenty (20) years; or

As security for an obligation, or in connection with the enforcement of an obligation;

“Real estate” means any leasehold or other estate or interest in, over, or under land, including structures, fixtures, and other improvements and interests that by custom, usage, or law pass with a conveyance of land, though not described in the contract of sale or instrument of conveyance. “Real estate” includes parcels with or without upper or lower boundaries, and spaces that may be filled with air or water;

“Residential purposes” means use for dwelling or non-commercial recreational purposes, or both;

“Special declarant rights” means rights, reserved for the benefit of a declarant:

To complete improvements indicated on plats and plans filed with the declaration pursuant to § 66-27-309;

To exercise any development right pursuant to § 66-27-310;

To maintain sales offices, management offices, signs advertising the condominium, and models pursuant to § 66-27-315;

To use easements through the common elements for the purpose of making improvements within the condominium or within real estate that may be added to the condominium pursuant to § 66-27-316;

To make the condominium part of a larger condominium or a planned community pursuant to § 66-27-323;

To make the condominium subject to a master association pursuant to § 66-27-321;

To appoint or remove any officer of the association or any master association or any member of the board of directors during any period of declarant control pursuant to § 66-27-403(c); or

To exercise any other rights reserved to the declarant in the declaration;

“Unit” means a physical portion of the condominium designated for separate ownership or occupancy, the boundaries of which are described pursuant to § 66-27-305(a)(4); and

“Unit owner” means a declarant or other person who owns a unit, or a lessee of a unit in a leasehold condominium whose lease expires simultaneously with any lease, the expiration or termination of which will remove the unit from the condominium, but does not include a person having an interest in a unit solely as security for an obligation.

Acts 2008, ch. 766, § 1.

66-27-204. Variation by agreement.

Except as expressly provided in this part and parts 3-5 of this chapter, this part and parts 3-5 of this chapter may not be varied by agreement, and rights conferred by this part and parts 3-5 of this chapter may not be waived. A declarant may not act under a power of attorney, or use any other device, to evade the limitations or prohibitions of this part and parts 3-5 of this chapter or the declaration.

Acts 2008, ch. 766, § 1.

66-27-205. Separate titles and taxation.

If there is any unit owner other than a declarant, each unit that has been created, together with its interest in the common elements, constitutes for all purposes a separate parcel of real estate.

If there is any unit owner other than a declarant, each unit must be separately taxed and assessed, and no separate tax or assessment may be rendered against any common elements.

If there is no unit owner other than a declarant, the real estate comprising the condominium may be taxed and assessed in any manner provided by law.

Acts 2008, ch. 766, § 1.

66-27-206. Applicability of local ordinances, regulations, and building codes.

A zoning, subdivision, building code, or other real estate use law, ordinance, or regulation may not prohibit the condominium form of ownership or impose any requirement upon a condominium that it would not impose upon a physically identical development under a different form of ownership. Otherwise, no provision of this part and parts 3-5 of this chapter invalidates or modifies any zoning, subdivision, building code, or other real estate use law, ordinance, or regulation.

Acts 2008, ch. 766, § 1.

66-27-207. Eminent domain.

If a unit is acquired by eminent domain, or if part of a unit is acquired by eminent domain leaving the unit owner with a remnant that may not practically or lawfully be used for all purposes permitted by the declaration, the award must compensate the unit owner for the unit owner's unit and its interest in the common elements, whether or not any common elements are acquired. Upon acquisition, unless the decree otherwise provides, that unit's allocated interests are automatically reallocated to the remaining units in proportion to the respective allocated interests of those units before the taking, and the association shall promptly prepare, execute, and record an amendment to the declaration reflecting the reallocations. Any remnant of a unit remaining after part of a unit is taken under this subsection (a) is thereafter a common element.

Except as provided in subsection (a), if part of a unit is acquired by eminent domain, the award must compensate the unit owner for the reduction in value of the unit and its interest in the common elements, whether or not any common elements are acquired. Upon acquisition, unless the decree otherwise provides that a unit's allocated interests are reduced in proportion to the reduction in the size of the unit, or on any other basis specified in the declaration, the portion of the allocated interests divested from the partially acquired unit are automatically reallocated to that unit and the remaining units in proportion to the respective allocated interests of those units before the taking, with the partially acquired unit participating in the reallocation on the basis of its reduced allocated interests.

If part of the common elements is acquired by eminent domain, the portion of the award attributable to the common elements taken must be paid to the association. Unless the declaration provides otherwise, any portion of the award attributable to the acquisition of a limited common element must be equally divided among the owners of the units to which that limited common element was allocated at the time of acquisition.

The court decree shall be recorded in every county in which any portion of the condominium is located.

Acts 2008, ch. 766, § 1; 2015, ch. 356, § 2.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment to (b) deleted “and” preceding “the portion of the allocated interests”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 356, § 4. May 4, 2015.

66-27-208. Supplemental general principles of law applicable.

The principles of law and equity, including the law of corporations and unincorporated associations and limited liability companies, the law of real property and the law relative to capacity to contract, principal and agent, eminent domain, estoppel, fraud, misrepresentation, duress, coercion, mistake, receivership, substantial performance, or other validating or invalidating cause supplement this part and parts 3-5 of this chapter, except to the extent inconsistent with this part and parts 3-5 of this chapter.

Acts 2008, ch. 766, § 1.

66-27-209. Construction against implicit repeal.

This part and parts 3-5, being general parts intended as a unified coverage of their subject matter, no part of them shall be construed to be implicitly repealed by subsequent legislation if that construction can reasonably be avoided.

Acts 2008, ch. 766, § 1.

66-27-210. Severability.

If any provision of this part and parts 3-5 of this chapter or the application of any provision to any person or circumstances is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this part and parts 3-5 of this chapter that can be given effect without the invalid provisions or applications, and to this end the provisions of this part and parts 3-5 of this chapter are severable.

Acts 2008, ch. 766, § 1.

66-27-211. Enforcement.

In addition to any other remedy provided by the declaration, any right or obligation declared by this part and parts 3-5 of this chapter is enforceable by judicial proceeding. If any person subject to this part and parts 3-5 of this chapter fails to comply with this part and parts 3-5 of this chapter or any provision of the declaration or bylaws, any person or class of persons adversely affected by the failure to comply has a claim for appropriate relief. The court, in an appropriate case involving willful failure to comply with this part and parts 3-5 of this chapter, or any provision of the declaration or bylaws, may award reasonable attorney's fees.

Acts 2008, ch. 766, § 1.